Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2542YC (4) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.52, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 3 contrary, an insurer may apply for and be issued a salvage 4 certificate of title for a motor vehicle without surrendering 5 the certificate of title or manufacturerâs or importerâs 6 statement of origin properly assigned if ownership of the 7 vehicle was transferred, or will transfer, to the insurer 8 pursuant to a settlement with the previous owner of the vehicle 9 arising from circumstances involving damage to the vehicle, 10 and at least thirty days have expired since the effective date 11 of such settlement. To obtain a salvage certificate of title 12 pursuant to this paragraph âaâ , the insurer shall submit an 13 application for a salvage certificate of title to any county 14 treasurer. The application shall must be accompanied by an one 15 of the following: 16 (a) An affidavit from the insurer in which the insurer 17 certifies it has made at least two written attempts to obtain 18 a properly assigned certificate of title or manufacturerâs or 19 importerâs statement of origin for the vehicle by contacting 20 the previous owner of the vehicle and all lienholders of 21 record by certified mail or a similar service that provides 22 proof of service using a return receipt, and has been unable 23 to obtain the title or statement of origin. The failure of a 24 previous owner or lienholder to provide a properly assigned 25 certificate of title or manufacturerâs or importerâs statement 26 of origin shall be deemed to be a waiver by the previous owner 27 or lienholder of all rights, title, claim, and interest in the 28 vehicle. The 29 (b) If the motor vehicle is deemed a total loss, one or 30 more supporting documents, including but not limited to a 31 power of attorney as described in section 321.49, a duplicate 32 certificate of title application submitted by the previous 33 owner, or an odometer statement required under section 321.71, 34 evidencing the transfer of ownership from the previous owner 35 -1- LSB 2542YC (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ to the insurer. Such supporting documents do not require 1 notarization and may be signed electronically. The insurer 2 shall indemnify and hold harmless the department for any 3 claims resulting from issuing a salvage certificate of title 4 pursuant to this subparagraph division. For purposes of this 5 subparagraph division, âtotal lossâ means the estimated repair 6 cost of the motor vehicle plus the projected salvage value of 7 the vehicle meets or exceeds the cash value of the vehicle 8 prior to the damage. 9 (2) An application shall made in accordance with 10 subparagraph (1) must also be accompanied by the application 11 fee required under paragraph âbâ , and proof of payment of the 12 total amount of the settlement by the insurer to the previous 13 owner of the vehicle. Upon receiving an application that 14 complies with this paragraph âaâ , the county treasurer shall 15 issue a salvage certificate of title to the insurer which shall 16 be free and clear of all liens and claims of ownership and 17 shall bear the word âSALVAGEâ stamped or printed on the face of 18 the title in a manner prescribed by the department. 19